Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-406
Council; testimony; power to compel; oaths.

The council or any committee of the members thereof shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses for the investigation of matters that may come before them; and the presiding officer of the council, or chairman of such committee for the time being, may administer such requisite oaths; and such council or committee shall have the same authority to compel the giving of testimony as is conferred on courts of justice.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 94, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 4899;

C.S.1922, § 4067;

C.S.1929, § 16-406;

R.S.1943, § 16-406.